North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-19 New Trials [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 59]

28-19-01.
New trial — Defined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-02.
Causes for new trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-03.
Time for motion for new trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-04.
Upon what motion for new trial made. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-05.
Notice of intention not required. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-06.
Memorandum decision on motion for new trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.

28-19-07.
Verdict vacated by court. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59.